Utah statutes.
23-25-4.   Procedures for issuing state.

(1)  When issuing a citation for a wildlife violation, a wildlife officer shall issue a citation to a person whose primary residence is in a participating state in the same manner as though the person were a resident of the issuing state and shall not require the person to post collateral to secure appearance, subject to the exceptions under Subsection (2), if the officer receives the recognizance of the person that he will comply with the terms of the citation.

(2)  Personal recognizance is acceptable:

(a)  if not prohibited by local law or the compact manual; and

(b)  if the violator provides adequate proof of identification to the wildlife officer.

(3) (a)  Upon conviction or failure of a person to comply with the terms of a wildlife citation, the appropriate official shall report the conviction or failure to comply to the licensing authority of the participating state in which the wildlife citation was issued.

(b)  The report shall be made in accordance with procedures specified by the issuing state and shall contain information as specified in the compact manual as minimum requirements for effective processing by the home state.

(4)  Upon receipt of the report of a conviction or noncompliance pursuant to Subsection (3)(b), the licensing authority of the issuing state shall transmit to the licensing authority of the home state of the violator the information in the form and with the content as prescribed in the compact manual.

